Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF348.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 2117XS (1) 91 jm/md S.F. 348 Section 1. Section 427A.1, Code 2025, is amended by adding 1 the following new subsection: 2 NEW SUBSECTION . 6A. Notwithstanding the other provisions 3 of this section, a structure shall not be assessed and taxed as 4 real property if the structure is not anchored to a permanent 5 foundation except by the structureâs own weight. 6 Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE. This Act, being deemed of immediate 7 importance, takes effect upon enactment. 8 Sec. 3. RETROACTIVE APPLICABILITY. This Act applies 9 retroactively to assessment years beginning on or after January 10 1, 2025. 11